Connecticut, session 2026, SB00433.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (c) of section 17b-369 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):
(c) (1) The Commissioner of Social Services shall develop a strategic
plan, consistent with the long-term care plan established pursuant to
section 17b-337, as amended by this act, to rebalance Medicaid long-
term care supports and services, including, but not limited to, those
supports and services provided in home, community-based settings and
institutional settings. The commissioner shall include home,
community-based and institutional providers in the development of the
strategic plan. In developing the strategic plan the commissioner shall
consider topics that include, but are not limited to: [(1)] (A) Regional
trends concerning the state's aging population; [(2)] (B) trends in the
demand for home, community-based and institutional services; [(3)] (C)
gaps in the provision of home and community-based services which
prevent community placements; [(4)] (D) gaps in the provision of
institutional care; [(5)] (E) the quality of care provided by home,
community-based and institutional providers; [(6)] (F) the condition of
institutional buildings; [(7)] (G) the state's regional supply of
LCO 1 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 433
institutional beds; [(8)] (H) the current rate structure applicable to home,
community-based and institutional services; [(9)] (I) the methods of
implementing adjustments to the bed capacity of individual nursing
facilities; and [(10)] (J) a review of the provisions of subsection (a) of
section 17b-354.
(2) On and after July 1, 2026, the Commissioner of Social Services shall
rebalance the strategic plan for long-term care supports and services to
increase opportunities for Medicaid beneficiaries and other persons
with limited income who do not qualify for Medicaid for aged, blind
and disabled persons to receive care in a home or community-based
setting. The rebalanced strategic plan shall include, but need not be
limited to, (A) increased outreach by the Department of Social Services
to Medicaid beneficiaries and other such persons who may be eligible
for the Connecticut home-care program for the elderly, established
pursuant to section 17b-342, and Medicaid waiver programs that
provide home or community-based care, and (B) assistance provided by
the department to such beneficiaries or other such persons in
completing applications for such programs. For purposes of this
subdivision, "limited income" means income not exceeding three
hundred per cent of the federal poverty level.
Sec. 2. Section 17b-337 of the general statutes is amended by adding
subsection (g) as follows (Effective from passage):
(NEW) (g) The Long-Term Care Planning Committee shall study
systems and methods to expand long-term care options for Medicaid
beneficiaries and other persons with limited income who do not qualify
for Medicaid for aged, blind and disabled persons, including, but not
limited to, allowing a greater number of such beneficiaries and persons
to receive care at home or in a community-based setting rather than in
skilled nursing facilities. Not later than December 1, 2027, the Long-
Term Care Planning Committee shall submit a report, in accordance
with the provisions of section 11-4a, to the joint standing committees of
the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to aging,
appropriations and the budgets of state agencies, human services and
LCO 2 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 433
public health on the study and any recommendations for appropriations
or legislation necessary to expand long-term care options. The report
shall include any estimated savings to the state related to reducing care
in skilled nursing facilities as a result of increasing options for care at
home or in a community-based setting. For purposes of this subsection,
"limited income" means income not exceeding three hundred per cent
of the federal poverty level.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage 17b-369(c)
Sec. 2 from passage 17b-337(g)
APP Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 3 of 3